Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 2. Oil and Hazardous Substance Discharge and Prevention Contingency Plans.

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For oil spill primary response action contractors, etc., see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 90, SLA 1989 provides that chapter 90, which enacted AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

, “does not relieve a person responsible for an oil terminal facility, offshore exploration or production facility, or a vessel that transports crude oil, or a person who has control of a hazardous substance, from the responsibility for containing and cleaning up a discharge of oil or the hazardous substance as required by law.”

Sec. 46.04.200.
State master plan.

The department shall prepare, annually review, and revise as necessary a statewide master oil and hazardous substance discharge prevention and contingency plan.

The state master plan prepared under this section must

take into consideration the elements of an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan approved or submitted for approval under AS

46.04.030

;

include incident command systems that clarify and specify the respective responsibilities of each of the following in the assessment, containment, and cleanup of various types and sizes of discharges of oil or a hazardous substance into the environment of the state:

the Department of Environmental Conservation, the division of homeland security and emergency management in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, and other agencies of the state; responsibilities assigned to each agency must be consistent with its statutory authority;

municipalities of the state;

appropriate federal agencies;

operators of facilities;

private parties whose land and other property may be affected by the oil or hazardous substance discharge; and

other parties identified by the commission as having an interest in or the resources to assist in the containment and cleanup of an oil or hazardous substance discharge;

include incident command systems that specify the respective responsibilities of parties identified in (2) of this subsection in an emergency response under AS 26.23, AS

46.03.865

, AS

46.04.080

, or AS

46.09.030

; responsibilities assigned to each state agency must be consistent with its statutory authority; and

identify actions necessary to reduce the likelihood of discharges of oil or hazardous substances.

If the commissioner determines that the state master plan should be revised, the commissioner shall

consult with municipal, community, and local emergency planning committee officials, and with representatives of affected regional organizations;

submit the draft plan with revisions to the public for review and comment;

submit to the legislature for review, not later than the 10th day following the convening of each regular session, any revision of the plan; and

submit any revision of the plan to the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission for its review under AS

26.23.077

.

In order to determine whether the state master plan should be revised, or at any other time the commissioner determines it necessary, the commissioner shall require or schedule unannounced oil spill drills to test the sufficiency of an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan approved under AS

46.04.030

or of the cleanup plans of a party identified under (b)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1989; am §§ 12, 13 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 23 ch 191 SLA 1990; am §§ 19, 20 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b), ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Sec. 46.04.210.
Regional master plan.

For any region of the state, the boundaries of which are determined by the commissioner by regulation, in which the department is required to review and approve an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan submitted by a person under AS

46.04.030

, the department shall prepare, annually review, and revise as necessary a regional master oil and hazardous substance discharge prevention and contingency plan.

The provisions of AS

46.04.200(b)

and (c) apply to preparation and review of a regional master plan under this section.

In setting boundaries under (a) of this section, the department shall, when possible, group together communities that are likely to require coordination of their efforts to respond effectively to a discharge.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1989; am § 24 ch 191 SLA 1990; am §§ 21, 22 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.